Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2275] University parking revolving
fund. There is established the university parking revolving fund. All
fees, fines, or other moneys collected under subpart B of part VI shall be
deposited into this fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for
the purposes of, and shall be expended by the board of regents in the manner
specified by, section [304A-2167.5]. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next